Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 3
INTERSTATE ENVIRONMENT COMPACT

12-10-40. Compact enacted and entered into; text of compact.

The Interstate Environment Compact is enacted into law and entered into with all other jurisdictions legally joining therein in the form substantially as follows:

"INTERSTATE ENVIRONMENT COMPACT

12-10-41. Commissioner as representative of state in compact.

The commissioner of natural resources or his designated representative shall represent the state in the Interstate Environment Compact.

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1533.)